incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="gjed/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eene</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eer</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="døg/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="æs/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cowboy__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ablegøye/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eva__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imag/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oane</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oa</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oar</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oen</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oet</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oi</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="CGS-systemet__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="inkj/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="essay__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bystyre"><i>bystyr</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gangklede"><i>gangkled</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bingeskilje"><i>bingeskilj</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovudemne"><i>hovudemn</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="attåtyrke"><i>attåtyrk</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ammunisjonslager"><i>ammunisjonslag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fathylle"><i>fathyll</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eddakvede"><i>eddakved</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glidelager"><i>glidelag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eigarbyte"><i>eigarbyt</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovdingsete"><i>hovdingset</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inkje"><i>inkj</i><par n="inkj/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hundre"><i>hundr</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="distansemerke"><i>distansemerk</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eldbjørgsminne"><i>eldbjørgsminn</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imago"><i>imag</i><par n="imag/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forklede"><i>forkled</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haustjamdøger"><i>haustjamdøg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ballerina"><i>ballerina</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="essay"><i>essay</i><par n="essay__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fråvære"><i>fråvær</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bøtesaker"><i>bøtesake</i><par n="ablegøye/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berelager"><i>berelag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flyktninglæger"><i>flyktninglæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gudsrike"><i>gudsrik</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="donna"><i>donna</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiendelæger"><i>fiendelæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="felæger"><i>felæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dadda"><i>dadda</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gruppemøte"><i>gruppemøt</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fôremne"><i>fôremn</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jamdøger"><i>jamdøg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="domene"><i>domen</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aksiallager"><i>aksiallag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barndøme"><i>barndøm</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="døger"><i>døg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fryselager"><i>fryselag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="CGS-systemet"><i>CGS-systemet</i><par n="CGS-systemet__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gongeklede"><i>gongekled</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="engroslager"><i>engroslag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eva"><i>eva</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anebilete"><i>anebilet</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="interneringslæger"><i>interneringslæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delelager"><i>delelag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bladstykke"><i>bladstykk</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fangelæger"><i>fangelæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herke"><i>herk</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hybelhusvære"><i>hybelhusvær</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiendslæger"><i>fiendslæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="botnstykke"><i>botnstykk</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarledømme"><i>jarledømm</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bufferlager"><i>bufferlag</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cowboy"><i>cowboy</i><par n="cowboy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeidsstykke"><i>arbeidsstykk</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belladonna"><i>belladonna</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geisha"><i>geisha</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høgdeleie"><i>høgdelei</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dagmamma"><i>dagmamma</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eigedomsgode"><i>eigedomsgod</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gjede"><i>gjed</i><par n="gjed/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diva"><i>diva</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="endefeste"><i>endefest</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ablegøyer"><i>ablegøye</i><par n="ablegøye/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fikserbilete"><i>fikserbilet</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evakueringslæger"><i>evakueringslæg</i><par n="døg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotspenne"><i>fotspenn</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnetekke"><i>barnetekk</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fåmannsstyre"><i>fåmannsstyr</i><par n="æs/e__n"/></e>
